Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 2. Operation of Vehicles Generally
§ 31-5-233.
Driving or having control of vehicle while under influence of intoxicating liquor or controlled substances; penalties.

As used in this section:

“Alcohol concentration” means:

The number of grams of alcohol per one hundred (100) milliliters of blood;

The number of grams of alcohol per two hundred ten (210) liters of breath; or

The number of grams of alcohol per seventy-five (75) milliliters of urine.

“Controlled substance” includes:

Any drug or substance defined by W.S. 35-7-1002(a)(iv);

Any glue, aerosol or other toxic vapor which when intentionally inhaled or sniffed results in impairment of an individual’s ability to drive safely;

Any drug or psychoactive substance, or any combination of these substances, capable of impairing a person’s physical or mental faculties.

“Conviction” means as defined in W.S. 31-7-102(a)(xi);

“Driver’s license” means as defined in W.S. 31-7-102(a)(xxv) and includes nonresident operating privileges as defined in W.S. 31-7-102(a)(xxx);

“Other law prohibiting driving while under the influence” means a statute of another state, the United States or a territory or district of the United States or an ordinance of a governmental entity of this or another state or of an Indian tribe which prohibits driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, alcohol, controlled substances or drugs;

“Child passenger” means a person traveling in a vehicle who is under sixteen (16) years of age;

“Alcohol” means any substance or substances containing any form of alcohol;

“Chemical test” means a test which analyzes an individual’s breath, blood, urine, saliva or other bodily fluids or tissues for evidence of drug or alcohol use.

No person shall drive or have actual physical control of any vehicle within this state if the person:

Has an alcohol concentration of eight one-hundredths of one percent (0.08%) or more;

Has an alcohol concentration of eight one-hundredths of one percent (0.08%) or more, as measured within two (2) hours after the time of driving or being in actual physical control of the vehicle following a lawful arrest resulting from a valid traffic stop; or

To a degree which renders him incapable of safely driving:

Is under the influence of alcohol;

Is under the influence of a controlled substance; or

Is under the influence of a combination of any of the elements named in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph.

Upon the trial of any criminal action or proceeding arising out of acts alleged to have been committed by any person while driving or being in actual physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, the amount of alcohol in the person’s blood at the time alleged as shown by chemical analysis of the person’s blood, urine, breath, or other bodily substance shall give rise to the following presumptions:

If there was at that time an alcohol concentration of five one-hundredths of one percent (0.05%) or less, it shall be presumed that the person was not under the influence of alcohol;

If there was at that time an alcohol concentration of more than five one-hundredths of one percent (0.05%) and less than eight one-hundredths of one percent (0.08%), that fact shall not give rise to any presumption that the person was or was not under the influence of alcohol, but it may be considered with other competent evidence in determining whether the person was under the influence of alcohol to a degree which renders him incapable of safely driving a motor vehicle.

Subsection (c) of this section shall not be construed as limiting the introduction of any other competent evidence bearing upon the question of whether the person was under the influence of alcohol, including tests obtained more than two (2) hours after the alleged violation. The fact that any person charged with a violation of subsection (b) of this section is or has been entitled to use the controlled substance under the laws of this state shall not constitute a defense against any charge under subsection (b) of this section.

Except as otherwise provided, a person convicted of violating this section shall be ordered to or shall receive a substance abuse assessment conducted by a substance abuse provider certified by the department of health pursuant to W.S. 9-2-2701(c) at or before sentencing. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, a nonresident may receive a substance abuse assessment from a provider certified by that person’s state of residence. The cost of the substance abuse assessment shall be assessed to and paid by the offender. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection or subsection (h) or (m) of this section, a person convicted of violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both. On a second offense resulting in a conviction within ten (10) years after a conviction for a violation of this section or other law prohibiting driving while under the influence, he shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than seven (7) days nor more than six (6) months, he shall be ordered to or shall receive a substance abuse assessment conducted by a substance abuse provider certified by the department of health pursuant to W.S. 9-2-2701(c) before sentencing and shall not be eligible for probation or suspension of sentence or release on any other basis until he has served at least seven (7) days in jail. In addition, the person may be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) nor more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00). On a third offense resulting in a conviction within ten (10) years after a conviction for a violation of this section or other law prohibiting driving while under the influence, he shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than six (6) months, shall receive a substance abuse assessment pursuant to W.S.

7-13-1302

and shall not be eligible for probation or suspension of sentence or release on any other basis until he has served at least thirty (30) days in jail except that the court shall consider the substance abuse assessment and may order the person to undergo outpatient alcohol or substance abuse treatment during any mandatory period of incarceration. The minimum period of imprisonment for a third violation shall be mandatory, but the court, having considered the substance abuse assessment and the availability of public and private resources, may suspend up to fifteen (15) days of the mandatory period of imprisonment if, subsequent to the date of the current violation, the offender completes an inpatient treatment program approved by the court. In addition, the person may be fined not less than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000.00). The judge may suspend part or all of the discretionary portion of an imprisonment sentence under this subsection and place the defendant on probation on condition that the defendant pursues and completes an alcohol education or treatment program as prescribed by the judge. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the term of probation imposed by a judge under this section may exceed the maximum term of imprisonment established for the offense under this subsection provided the term of probation together with any extension thereof, shall not exceed three (3) years for up to and including a third conviction. On a fourth offense resulting in a conviction or subsequent conviction within ten (10) years for a violation of this section or other law prohibiting driving while under the influence, he shall be guilty of a felony and fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), punished by imprisonment for not more than seven (7) years, or both.

Any person convicted under this section or other law prohibiting driving while under the influence as defined in W.S. 31-5-233(a)(v), or whose prosecution under this section is deferred under W.S.

7-13-301

, shall, in addition to the penalty imposed:

Have his driver’s license suspended or revoked pursuant to W.S.

31-7-127

or

31-7-128

. The court shall forward to the department a copy of the record pertaining to disposition of the arrest or citation;

Except as provided in subsection (n) of this section, for a first conviction, or for a prosecution deferred under W.S.

7-13-301

, where the department’s administrative action indicates the person had an alcohol concentration of fifteen one-hundredths of one percent (0.15%) or more, operate only vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device, pursuant to W.S.

31-7-401

through

31-7-404

, for a period of six (6) months. For purposes of this paragraph, the department’s administrative action shall be deemed to indicate a person had an alcohol concentration of fifteen one-hundredths of one percent (0.15%) or more only after the person is notified of and given the opportunity to pursue the administrative procedures provided by W.S.

31-7-105

;

Except as provided in subsection (n) of this section, for a second conviction, operate only vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device, pursuant to W.S.

31-7-401

through

31-7-404

, for a period of one (1) year;

Except as provided in subsection (n) of this section, for a third conviction, operate only vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device, pursuant to W.S. 31-7-401 through 31-7-404, for a period of two (2) years;

For a fourth or subsequent conviction, operate only vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device, pursuant to W.S. 31-7-401 through 31-7-404, for the remainder of the offender’s life, except five (5) years from the date of conviction and every five (5) years thereafter, the offender may apply to the court for removal of the ignition interlock device required by this paragraph. The court may, for good cause shown, remove the ignition interlock device requirement if the offender has not been subsequently convicted of driving a motor vehicle in violation of this section or other law prohibiting driving while under the influence as defined in W.S. 31-5-233(a)(v).

The court may, upon pronouncement of any jail sentence under subsection (e) of this section, provide in the sentence that the defendant may be permitted, if he is employed or enrolled in school and can continue his employment or education, to continue such employment or education for not more than the time necessary as certified by his employer or school administrator, and the remaining day, days or parts of days shall be spent in jail until the sentence is served. He shall be allowed out of jail only long enough to complete his actual hours of employment or education and a reasonable time to travel to and from his place of employment or school. Unless the defendant is indigent, the court shall require him as a condition of special treatment under this subsection to pay a reasonable amount for room and board as determined by the sheriff.

As used in this subsection, “serious bodily injury” means as defined in W.S. 6-1-104(a)(x). Whoever causes serious bodily injury to another person resulting from the violation of this section shall be punished upon conviction as follows:

If not subject to the penalty under paragraph (ii) of this subsection, by a fine of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, or both;

If previously convicted and sentenced under this subsection, or any other law substantially conforming to the provisions of this subsection, by imprisonment for not more than twenty (20) years; and

Any person convicted under this subsection shall have his driver’s license revoked as provided in W.S.

31-7-127

.

Any person charged under this section or a municipal ordinance which substantially conforms to the provisions of this section shall be prosecuted under this section or the ordinance and not under a reduced charge or dismissed unless the prosecuting attorney in open court moves or files a statement to reduce the charge or dismiss, with supporting facts, stating that there is insufficient evidence to sustain the charge.

Chemical analysis of a person’s blood, breath or urine to determine alcohol concentration or controlled substance content shall be performed in accordance with W.S. 31-6-105(a).

Any person eighteen (18) years of age or older who has a child passenger in the vehicle during a violation of this section shall be punished upon conviction as follows:

For a first conviction under this subsection, by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both;

If previously convicted and sentenced under this subsection, or any other law substantially conforming to the provisions of this subsection, by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years.

The court may, as an alternative or in addition to the requirements of W.S. 31-5-233(f)(ii) through (iv), require a person otherwise restricted to operating only motor vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device under W.S. 31-5-233(f)(ii) through (iv) to participate in a program established under the 24/7 Sobriety Program Act, W.S.

7-13-1701

et seq., for the period specified in W.S. 31-5-233(f)(ii) through (iv). A person required to participate in a 24/7 sobriety program as an alternative to the requirements of W.S. 31-5-233(f)(ii) through (iv) shall be granted a restricted driver’s license under W.S. 31-7-109(m) upon proper application under rules established by the department and provided that the person enrolls in and complies with the requirements of the 24/7 sobriety program.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 126, § 25; 1941, ch. 66, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 60-414; Laws 1953, ch. 184, § 1; 1955, ch. 97, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-129; Laws 1961, ch. 168, § 1; 1973, ch. 22, § 1; 1975, ch. 67, § 1; 1979, ch. 15, § 1; 1980, ch. 58, § 1; 1981, ch. 12, § 1; 1982, ch. 50, § 1; ch. 52, § 1; 1984, ch. 41, § 2; 1985, ch. 39, § 1; ch. 234, § 1; 1987, ch. 131, § 1; ch. 189, § 1; 1989, ch. 39, § 1; ch. 119, § 2; 1995, ch. 122, § 2; 1999, ch. 199, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 61, § 1; 2003, ch. 47, § 1; 2005, ch. 43, § 1; 2007, ch. 72, § 1; ch. 87, § 1; 2009, ch. 160, § 1; 2010, ch. 5, § 1; 2011, ch. 39, § 1; ch. 122, § 1; 2012, ch. 43, § 1; 2014 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 40, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2019 ch. 49, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to implied consent to chemical testing, see chapter 6 of this title.

For Controlled Substances Act, see §

35-7-1001

et seq.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in (e), added the first two sentences, and inserted “he shall be ordered to or shall receive a substance abuse assessment conducted by a substance abuse provider certified by the department of health pursuant to W.S. 9-2-2701(c) before sentencing.”

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 72, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, added (a)(vi); in (e) inserted “or m” following “subsection or subsection (h)”; and added (m).

The second 2007 amendment by ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, in (h)(i) deleted “less than six (6) months nor” preceding “more than” and substituted “ten (10) years” for “one (1) year).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (f), substituted “other law prohibiting driving while under the influence as defined in W.S. 31-5-233(a)(v)” for “a municipal ordinance which substantially conforms to the provisions of this section”; designated the existing provisions beginning with “Have his driver’s license suspended” as (f)(i); and added (f)(ii) through (f)(v).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (a)(ii)(C), (a)(vii), and (a)(viii); added (b)(ii), redesignated former (b)(ii) as (b)(iii) and made a related change; substituted “two (2) hours” for “three (3) hours” in (d); in (e) inserted “offense resulting in a conviction” or variants throughout, and substituted “ten (10) years” for “five (5) years” throughout.

The 2011 amendments. —

The first amendment, by Laws 2011, ch. 39, § 1, effective July 1, 2011, in (f)(ii), substituted “the department's administrative action indicates the person had” for “the conviction is based on the person having,” deleted “from the date of conviction” at the end of the first sentence, and added the second sentence; and deleted “from the date of conviction” at the end of (f)(iii) and (f)(iv).

The second amendment, by Laws 2011, ch. 122, § 1, effective July 1, 2011, in (m)(i), added “a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (e), substituted “seven (7) years” for “two (2) years” near the end.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “as defined in W.S. 6-1-104(a)(x)” for “bodily injury which creates a reasonable likelihood of death or which causes miscarriage or serious permanent disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of any bodily member or organ” in the introductory paragraph of (h).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (e), inserted the present second sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (f), inserted “or whose or whose prosecution under this section is deferred under W.S.

7-13-301

” following “as defined in W.S. 31-5-233(a)(v),” in (f)(ii) through (f)(iv), inserted the introductory language, “Except as provided in subsection (n) of this section,” in (f)(ii), inserted “or for a prosecution deferred under W.S.

7-13-301

” following “first conviction”; and added (n).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Application. —

Laws 2011, ch. 39, § 2, provides: “This act shall apply only to persons who are charged with a violation of W.S.

31-5-233

, or other law prohibiting driving while under the influence as defined in W.S.

31-5-233

(a)(v), on or after July 1, 2011.”

Interlock device removal application. —

District court erred and abused its discretion by denying the applicant’s request for a hearing to remove his lifetime interlock device because the statute required the court to hold a hearing to give the applicant an opportunity to show good cause after he made a prima facie showing for relief. The court could not deny the application based solely on the applicant’s number of DUI convictions. Schneider v. State, 2022 WY 31, 505 P.3d 591,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2022).

Look-back period.—

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-5-233(e) unambiguously provides that the look-back period for enhanced DWUI penalties is measured back in time, up to 10 years, from the last offense. Ramirez v. State, 2016 WY 128, 386 P.3d 348,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2016).

District court properly denied defendant's motion to dismiss a felony DUI charge where the legislature had, in effect, changed the measure of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-5-233(e) (2015) from the date of the conviction to the actual conduct of driving drunk, and as a result, his April 2005 conviction was properly including in calculating the number of offenses. Ramirez v. State, 2016 WY 128, 386 P.3d 348,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2016).

Because the information charged defendant with driving while under the influence subject to felony sentence enhancement, thus invoking the district court’s subject matter jurisdiction, defendant, by entering an unconditional guilty plea, waived the right to challenge whether the State of Wyoming could prove defendant had three offenses resulting in convictions within the ten-year look back period as required by statute. Protz v. State, 2019 WY 24, 435 P.3d 394,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2019).

Tribal law as basis for revocation. —

A conviction for driving under the influence pursuant to Tribal law may support the revocation of a driver's license. Pogue v. Allison, 851 F. Supp. 1536, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6234 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Statute not constitutionally vague as applied.

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-5-233(b)(iii)(C) was not unconstitutionally vague as applied to defendant's
conduct where the evidence showed that he had driven his pickup truck
more than seven hours after consuming beer and marijuana, he rolled
his vehicle twice on the way home, his BAC was .09 percent and THC
level was 3.43 nanograms after the second accident, and thus, a person
of ordinary intelligence would have understood that the influence
of two intoxicating substances made him incapable of driving safely. Guilford v. State, 2015 WY 147, 362 P.3d 1015,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 2015).

Provisions in former subsection (e) unconstitutional. —

The surrender of a driver's license as a part of the penalty defined by the legislature for driving while intoxicated can be the function of the court imposing sentence, but the legislature has not seen fit to include suspension or revocation of drivers' licenses as part of the criminal penalty. The provisions in former subsection (e), therefore, for the collection of a driver's license by the court and for the issuance of a temporary driver's license by the court are unconstitutional in that they violate art. 2, § 1, Wyo. Const. by directing the exercise of powers properly belonging to the executive branch of the government to the judicial branch. State ex rel. Motor Vehicle Div. v. Holtz, 674 P.2d 732,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1983) (decided prior to 1984 amendment).

Subsection (b) is not unconstitutional

because of the alleged vagueness or ambiguity of the words “actual physical control.” Adams v. State, 697 P.2d 622,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 469

(Wyo. 1985).

Section 6-2-106(b) (aggravated homicide by vehicle) is not unconstitutional on equal protection grounds.

The legislature recognized the seriousness of the harm caused when death results from a violation of this section and provided for a correspondingly stiffer penalty.
Hodgins v. State, 706 P.2d 655,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 555

(Wyo. 1985).

Standing to challenge constitutionality of subsection (j). —

The defendant, charged under former subsection (h) (now (j)), which provided that “any person charged under this section shall be prosecuted under this section and not under a reduced charge,” had no right to any plea bargain with the prosecutor or to the reduction or dismissal of charges against her. Without such a right, she had no standing to challenge the constitutionality of former subsection (h) on the grounds that it constituted an infringement on the prosecutorial discretion of the executive branch of government, which is a violation of the constitutional separation of powers. Gooden v. State, 711 P.2d 405,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 618

(Wyo. 1985).

A stipulation setting forth the traditional plea bargaining practice in the municipal court of the city of Cheyenne was not sufficient to afford defendant standing to challenge the constitutionality of former subsection (h) (now (j)), on the alleged ground that it violated the separation of powers doctrine. Lacombe v. Cheyenne, 733 P.2d 601,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 400

(Wyo. 1987).

Purpose and effect of section. —

See Moore v. State, 542 P.2d 109,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1975).

No legal duty to arrest. —

District court properly dismissed wrongful death action against police officer who did not arrest an intoxicated motorist following a traffic stop; a police officer's decision to arrest is a discretionary function, not mandated by Wyoming statutes. McCoy v. Crook County Sheriff's Dep't, 987 P.2d 674,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1999).

No arrest outside municipal boundaries, absent warrant. —

A municipal peace officer acting without a warrant may not lawfully arrest an individual DWUI outside of the boundaries of the municipality which he serves, unless such arrest is the result of fresh pursuit. State v. Stahl, 838 P.2d 1193,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1992).

Officer must have probable cause. —

A peace officer may not arrest an individual for DWUI merely because it is late at night and, during an unrelated traffic stop, the officer detects the odor of alcohol. Rather, the peace officer must have probable cause to believe that the individual has actual physical control of a motorized vehicle while legally intoxicated. Keehn ex rel. Keehn v. Town of Torrington, 834 P.2d 112,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 1992).

Substantial evidence supported the Office of Administrative Hearings'
(OAH) decision to uphold the suspension of the driver's license for failing to submit to chemical testing pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

31-6-102

because: (1) the trooper stated that he saw the driver's vehicle cross over the center line and the fog line more than once; and (2) the OAH reviewed the DVD of the incident, which showed the vehicle drifting from one side of lane to the other more than once and therefore corroborated the trooper's statements, even though it did not depict clearly whether the vehicle crossed over the lines due to its poor quality and limited duration. Taken together, the trooper's report and the DVD constituted relevant evidence from which a reasonable mind could conclude that the trooper had probable cause to stop the vehicle for a traffic violation, namely driving under the influence or failing to drive within the lanes.
Tiernan v. State, DOT, 2011 WY 143, 262 P.3d 561,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2011), overruled in part, Allgier v. State, 2015 WY 137, 358 P.3d 1271,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 2015).

Fact that evidence might have come forth after defendant's arrest, indicating defendant was in a diabetic ketoacidosis state, did not change the conclusion that an officer had probable cause at the time to believe defendant was driving in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-5-233(b); defendant was clocked at 96 miles per hour and had watery eyes, slurred speech, poor balance, and smelled like alcohol.
Wyo. DOT v. State ex rel. DOT, 2012 WY 33, 271 P.3d 1003,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2012), reh'g denied,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. Apr. 3, 2012).

Deputy had probable cause to stop appellant for failing to drive within a single lane of traffic as his report stated that appellant's truck went across the centerline and the fog line before regaining a single lane of travel; the lane violations were also shown on a DVD. Because the deputy observed signs that appellant had been drinking alcohol and he failed sobriety tests, the deputy arrested appellant for driving while under the influence of alcohol; as a breath test that showed appellant had an alcohol concentration of 0.17%, more than two times the legal limit allowed for driving, his license was suspended.
Espinoza v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT, 2012 WY 101, 280 P.3d 1226,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 2012), overruled in part, Allgier v. State, 2015 WY 137, 358 P.3d 1271,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 2015).

Probable cause for arrest for driving while under influence of alcohol exists

where the officer initially detects excessive speed and erratic driving, then detects a strong odor of alcohol, where the driver's balance is unsteady, his face is flushed and his speech is slurred, and where the driver fails the field sobriety test. Vrooman v. State, 642 P.2d 782,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 318

(Wyo. 1982).

A law enforcement officer had probable cause to arrest a motorist where the motorist broke a traffic law by moving into the oncoming lane, failed a sobriety test, had glassy eyes, smelled of alcohol, and admitted to drinking alcohol that evening. Nellis v. Wyoming DOT, 932 P.2d 741,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1997).

In prosecution under section, proof of unsafe driving was not required,

although such was competent evidence to be considered with all of the other evidence in determining whether the driver was under the influence of intoxicating liquor to a degree that he was incapable of safely driving. Olson v. State, 698 P.2d 107,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1985).

Driver, unconscious and intoxicated behind steering wheel, in “actual physical control” of vehicle. —

There was sufficient evidence to support the trial court's finding that the defendant, who was found unconscious and intoxicated behind the steering wheel of an off-the-road vehicle, with the lights off, the engine not running and the ignition key in the “off” position, was in “actual physical control” of his vehicle at the time of his arrest. Adams v. State, 697 P.2d 622,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 469

(Wyo. 1985).

Evidence of alcohol ingestion necessary for DUI conviction. —

For a person to be convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, there must be some evidence of ingestion of alcohol: poor performance in a field sobriety test, by itself, is not sufficient to support a conviction. Crum v. Rock Springs, 652 P.2d 27,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 392

(Wyo. 1982).

But evidence of blood test is not required

to prove that a person was under the influence of intoxicating liquor. Crum v. Rock Springs, 652 P.2d 27,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 392

(Wyo. 1982).

Breath test procedures. —

After appellant performed poorly on the horizontal gaze nystagmus test and the walk and turn test, he was arrested for driving while under the influence of alcohol in violation of this section and his licence was suspended pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-6-102(e); the hearing examiner's decision that the officer complied with the 15 minute observation period for admission of a chemical test was supported by the Operational Checklist showing appellant was observed for an eighteen-minute period before his breath sample was taken.
Hwang v. State, 2011 WY 20, 247 P.3d 861,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 2011).

Implied consent law is exclusive means and required procedure to determine blood-alcohol level

where a suspect is arrested and the law enforcement officer has probable cause to suspect a violation of this section. State v. Chastain, 594 P.2d 458,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1979), overruled, Olson v. State, 698 P.2d 107,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1985) (see chapter 6 of this title for implied consent law); Van Order v. State, 600 P.2d 1056,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 463

(Wyo. 1979).

Statutory presumption of intoxication is not applicable to civil action for damages,

as such an instruction is an improper comment on the evidence. Combined Ins. Co. v. Sinclair, 584 P.2d 1034,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1978).

Use of section in connection with instruction to jury. —

See Goich v. State, 80 Wyo. 179, 339 P.2d 119,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1959).

In prosecution for causing death while driving car at unreasonable speed, while intoxicated, and without having car under absolute control, instruction authorizing conviction, if deceased came to death by one or more of modes in which defendant drove automobile, was not erroneous. Thompson v. State, 41 Wyo. 72, 283 P. 151,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1929).

Trial court properly refused instructions which unduly emphasized one aspect of evidence,

i.e., that the odor of alcohol, or the manner in which the vehicle was driven, standing alone, was insufficient to convict. Ellifritz v. State, 704 P.2d 1300,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 531

(Wyo. 1985).

Error to lower standard of required behavior. —

Where the defendant was convicted of aggravated homicide by vehicle, in violation of § 6-2-106(b), and where the trial court gave the instruction that the phrase in subsection (b)(ii)(A) “under the influence of intoxicating liquor” (now “alcohol”) means a condition, caused by the consumption of intoxicants, that makes a person “less able to exercise clear judgment,” the instruction incorrectly lowered the standard from “incapable of safely driving,” as specified in subsection (b)(ii), to “less able to exercise clear judgment” and it was error for the court to give the challenged instruction. Redland v. State, 766 P.2d 1173,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1989).

Implied consent warnings adequate. —

In an administrative
license suspension proceeding, the Office of Administrative Hearings
and the district court correctly held that appellant was accurately
advised of the consequences of refusing to submit to a chemical test
under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-6-102(a)(ii) upon her arrest for DUI; the officer's additional advisement that she could be prosecuted under a municipal ordinance for refusing to take a breath test did not trick appellant. The advisement given by the arresting officer was not misleading, even though appellant was not told that she faced the same minimum mandatory jail sentence under this section if she had a blood alcohol concentration over 0.15%
as she did if she refused the chemical test. Walters v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT, 2013 WY 59, 300 P.3d 879,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2013).

Evidence sufficient to sustain conviction. —

Evidence supported defendant’s conviction for driving under the influence causing serious bodily injury because law enforcement officers testified that defendant drove erratically and at high speed, defendant’s blood tested positive for methamphetamine, a state trooper found a pipe in defendant’ truck which tested positive for the presence of methamphetamine residue, a forensic toxicologist testified about the typical effects of methamphetamine, and defendant crashed into a motorcyclist when attempting to pass around the motorcyclist. Nesius v. State, 2019 WY 129, 454 P.3d 927,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2019).

See Lewallen v. State, 536 P.2d 148,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1975); Bloomquist v. State, 914 P.2d 812,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1996).

Defendant's motion to suppress was properly denied as the totality of the circumstances created a reasonable suspicion that defendant was committing a crime; the evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of DUI, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §
31-5-233(b)(iii)(A), as the State proved he drove the vehicle, was incapable of safely driving, and was under the influence of alcohol.
Venegas v. State, 2012 WY 136, 287 P.3d 746,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 2012).

Defendant convicted despite stricken evidence that he refused to take sobriety test. —

The trial court did not commit prejudicial error in denying a motion for a mistrial when, in a trial to the court, questionable evidence as to the defendant's refusal to submit to a sobriety test was elicited and later stricken. There was sufficient evidence in the record absent this evidence for proper conviction of driving while under the influence, and therefore no error was committed. If error did occur, then the error was cured when the defendant also testified during his direct examination that he refused to take the test. Feeney v. State, 714 P.2d 1229,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 493

(Wyo. 1986).

Evidence sufficient to sustain conviction without reliance on results of blood test. —

See Joelson v. State, 674 P.2d 229,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 240

(Wyo. 1984).

Evidence that alcohol was ingested by the defendant and that his driving afterwards was erratic, rendering him incapable of safely operating a motor vehicle, was sufficient to support the charge of driving under the influence, although a blood test was not given. Walston v. State, 704 P.2d 696,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 522

(Wyo. 1985).

Conviction of aggravated assault, DUI injury, constitutional. —

The prosecution and conviction of the defendant for aggravated assault and battery after he pled guilty to causing serious bodily injury to another as a result of driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor did not violate the constitutional prohibition against double jeopardy, since each offense required proof of an element not necessary for proof of the other. Nowack v. State, 774 P.2d 561,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1989).

Authority to suspend or revoke license. —

Drivers' licenses are not suspended at the time of conviction for driving while intoxicated by operation of law. The licenses are suspended or revoked by the division (now department). The principal objective of involving the courts in the suspension and revocation procedure is to obtain immediate surrender of the license, but the division is intended to perform the function of suspension or revocation. State ex rel. Motor Vehicle Div. v. Holtz, 674 P.2d 732,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1983) (decided prior to 1984 amendment).

Authority of BIA agents. —

Under the Wyoming Statutes, Bureau of Indian Affairs agents have the authority to compel the surrender or suspension of a person's Wyoming driver's license. Pogue v. Allison, 851 F. Supp. 1536, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6234 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Driver's detention by Bureau of Indian Affairs (BIA) officers for driving while under the influence (DWUI) did not render his subsequent arrest by deputy sheriff unlawful because the driver could not have been arrested and prosecuted within the tribal court system as he was not a tribal member, and he could not have been arrested by the BIA officer and prosecuted within the federal system because the DWUI offense was a State offense, he was therefore subject to arrest and prosecution by the State. The BIA officer properly detained the driver for formal arrest by a state officer, and the deputy sheriff had the authority to enforce the DWUI and implied consent statutes.
Colyer v. State, 2009 WY 43, 203 P.3d 1104,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2009).

Authority of federal officer to administer breathalyzer test. —

Section

31-6-102

states that a breathalyzer test may be administered by a peace officer which is defined by §

7-2-101

to include various positions, all of which share one important common fact: they are state employees. However, if a federal officer is precluded from administering a breathalyzer test under §

31-6-102

to an individual who is arrested on federal property, then it stands to follow that no one could administer a breath test to that individual. This literal reading would lead to an absurd result; therefore, a federal airman officer could execute the breathalyzer test on federal property. United States v. Santiago, 846 F. Supp. 1486, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2766 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Section deemed habitual criminal act. —

The statutory requirement that the sentence to be imposed by the court for driving while intoxicated be more severe as the number of prior convictions of the defendant increases makes the statute a habitual criminal act. Before the sentence of a defendant can be so enhanced, he must have notice of the fact that such is contemplated. Generally, the notice must be contained in the information or charge under which he is prosecuted. State ex rel. Motor Vehicle Div. v. Holtz, 674 P.2d 732,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1983).

But only convictions under this section can be counted as prior convictions. —

Neither prior convictions for driving while intoxicated under the laws of other states or under municipal ordinances of this state can be considered in connection with sentences or with suspension or revocation of drivers' licenses. Only convictions under this section can be counted as prior convictions for enhancement of sentences or for suspension and revocation of drivers' licenses. State ex rel. Motor Vehicle Div. v. Holtz, 674 P.2d 732,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1983).

Out-of-state convictions may be used for enhancement purposes. —
